src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s25_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - liva: # 
    liva+V+Inf: liva
    liva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: livir
    liva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: livdi
    liva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: livdu
    liva+V+Sup: livað
    liva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: livaður
